District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

7-1541.08

Authority of licensed blood banks to transfer blood components within District.

Recodified as § 7-1551.01.

May 18, 1970, 84 Stat. 218, Pub. L. 91-256
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 9, 36 DCR 492